GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-more.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     additional lexicon entries
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj +Interj

+Weekday
+Month

+Indef
+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abbr

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space
[h]	! add h for masculine plural 

LEXICON ROOT 

accessibile+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
accettabile+Adj			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
additivo+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
additivo+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
adeguamento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
affidabilità+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
aggravato+Adj			MFSGPL;
alcol+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
alimentare+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008		
alimentatore+Noun		MFSGPL;
allevatore+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
altro+Adj+Indef			MSGPL;
ambientale+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@22/07/2008
ambito+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@22/07/2008
amministrativo+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@22/07/2008
ammodernamento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
ammontare+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
andamento+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
antisemitismo+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
antiuomo+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
appartenenza+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
approdo+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
approvvigionamento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
armatore+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
armatore+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
astenuto+Noun			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
attivo+Noun			MSGPL;
atto+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
attrezzatura+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
audiovisivi+Noun		MPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
audiovisivo+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
audit+Noun			MSP;		!AS@23/07/2008
autodeterminazione+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
beneficiario+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
beneficiario+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
biologico+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@22/07/2008	pl:-ci
biotecnologie+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
bovini+Noun			MPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
bovino+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
cantieristica+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
carente+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
cd+Noun				MSP;
CD+Noun				MSP;
cd-rom+Noun			MSP;
CD-ROM+Noun			MSP;
chirografario+Noun		MSGPL;
cioccolato+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
clonazione+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
codecisione+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
cofinanziamento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
coincenerimento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
coinvolgimento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
complementarità+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
computer+Noun			MSP;		!AS@23/07/2008
concertazione+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
dato+Adj			MFSGPL;
decisionale+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
dimostrante+Noun		MSGPL;
diossina+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
disabili+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
disabili+Noun			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
dissidente+Noun			MFSGPL;
divario+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
divieto+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
e-mail+Noun			FSP;
email+Noun			FSP;
ente+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
esauriente+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
esecutivo+Noun			MSGPL;
esplicito+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
etichettatura+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
euro+Noun			MSP;
ex+Adj				#;		!AS@18/07/2008
familiare+Noun			MSGPL;
finanziamento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
finanziaria+Noun		FSGPL;
fiscalità+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
forestale+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
forestale+Noun			MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
fornitura+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
forum+Noun			MSP;		!AS@23/07/2008
globalizzazione+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@18/07/2008
gruppo+Noun			MSGPL;		! AS@18/07/2008
gruppuscolo+Noun		MSGPL;
ideologia+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
incenerimento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
indagato+Noun			MSGPL;
intergovernativa+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
interistituzionale+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
internet+Noun			MSG;		!AS@22/07/2008
interoperabilità+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
interrogativo+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
interrogativo+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
lobby+Noun			MSP;		!AS@23/07/2008
lombosciatalgia+Noun		FSGPL;
media+Noun			MPL;
mix+Noun			MSP;
monitoraggio+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
monoblocc[h]o+Noun		MSGPL;
multinazionale+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
multinazionale+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
nascente+Adj			MFSGPL;
no% global+Noun			MSP;
occupazionale+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
OGM+Noun+Acron			MSG;		!AS@23/07/2008	
ONG+Noun+Acron			FSG;		!AS@23/07/2008
partenariato+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
peggio+Adj			MFINV;
peggio+Noun			MSP;
pensionistico+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008	pl:-ci
percento+Noun			MSG;		!AS@22/07/2008
periferico+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008	pl:-ci
pianeta+Noun			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
plic[h]o+Noun			MSGPL;
postuniversitario+Adj		MFSGPL;
preadesione+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
precariato+Noun			MSGPL;
profuso+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
proprietario+Noun		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
protetto+Adj			MFSGPL;
proveniente+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008			
quotidiano+Noun			MSGPL;
radicalsocialista+Noun		MSGPL;
raggiungimento+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
riciclaggio+Noun		MSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
ristrutturazione+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@18/07/2008
riunificazione+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
scissionista+Noun		MSGPL;
serietà+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
server+Noun			MSP;
sfocato+Adj			MFSGPL;
sfuocato+Adj			MFSGPL;
sic+Interj			#;		!AS@18/07/2008
sorta+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
statistica+Noun			FSGPL;		!AS@22/07/2008
statistico+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@22/07/2008	pl:-ci
status+Noun			MSP;		!AS@23/07/2008
status% quo+Noun		MSP;		!AS@23/07/2008
strategico+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008	pl:-ci
sussidiarietà+Noun		FSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
top% model+Noun			FSG;		!AS@18/07/2008
top+Noun			MSG;		!AS@18/07/2008
transfrontaliero+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
transnazionale+Adj		MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008
vigente+Adj			MFSGPL;		!AS@23/07/2008

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# days of the week
lunedì+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
lunedì+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:lun	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
martedì+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
martedì+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:mar	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
mercoledì+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
mercoledì+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:mer	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
giovedì+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
giovedì+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:gio	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
venerdì+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
venerdì+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:ven	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
sabato+Noun+Weekday		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
sabato+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:sab	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
domenica+Noun+Weekday		FSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
domenica+Noun+Weekday+Abbr:dom	FSP;		!AS@07/08/2008

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# months of the year
gennaio+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
gennaio+Noun+Month+Abbr:gen	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
febbraio+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
febbraio+Noun+Month+Abbr:feb	MSP;		!@07/08/2008
marzo+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
marzo+Noun+Month+Abbr:mar	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
aprile+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
aprile+Noun+Month+Abbr:apr	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
maggio+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
maggio+Noun+Month+Abbr:mag	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
giugno+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
giugno+Noun+Month+Abbr:giu	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
luglio+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
luglio+Noun+Month+Abbr:lug	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
agosto+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
agosto+Noun+Month+Abbr:ago	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
settembre+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
settembre+Noun+Month+Abbr:set	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
ottobre+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
ottobre+Noun+Month+Abbr:ott	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
novembre+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
novembre+Noun+Month+Abbr:nov	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008
dicembre+Noun+Month		MSGPL;		!AS@07/08/2008
dicembre+Noun+Month+Abbr:dic	MSP;		!AS@07/08/2008

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# continuation classes
LEXICON MFINV	+MF+SP		#;

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;
